Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-424
Assault, escape, or attempt to escape;
documentation required; copy to court and county attorney.

If a juvenile assaults
an employee of a youth rehabilitation and treatment center or another juvenile
who has been committed to the youth rehabilitation and treatment center or
escapes or attempts to escape from a youth rehabilitation and treatment center,
the chief executive officer of the youth rehabilitation and treatment center
shall document the assault, escape, or attempt to escape and send a copy of
such documentation to the committing court and the county attorney of the
county in which the committing court is located as soon as possible after
the determination that such assault, escape, or attempt to escape has occurred.
Such documentation may be offered as evidence presented at any hearing conducted
pursuant to section 43-2,106.03.

Laws 2012, LB972, § 6.